pt-BR: Recursos de controle de feedback do amplificador acústico: Filtro antifeedback (automático); Filtro antifeedback (manual); Supressão automática de feedback; Controle de ressonância do corpo; Redução de feedback (varredura de frequência); Filtro passa-alta (HPF); Filtro de corte de graves; Filtro notch; Chave de fase; Outros
nb: Akustisk forsterker tilbakemeldinger kontrollfunksjoner: Anti-feedback-filter (automatisk); Anti-feedback-filter (manuelt); Automatisk feedback-demping; Kroppsresonanskontroll; Feedback-reduksjon (frekvenssveip); Høypassfilter (HPF); Low-cut-filter; Notch-filter; Fasebryter; Annet
hu: Akusztikus erősítő visszajelzésének vezérlési funkciói: Gerjedésgátló szűrő (automatikus); Gerjedésgátló szűrő (kézi); Automatikus gerjedésgátlás; Testrezonancia-szabályozás; Gerjedéscsökkentés (frekvenciasöprés); Felüláteresztő szűrő (HPF); Mélyvágó szűrő; Notch-szűrő; Fáziskapcsoló; Egyéb
sv: Kontrollfunktioner för feedback från förstärkare: Rundgångsfilter (automatiskt); Rundgångsfilter (manuellt); Automatisk rundgångsdämpning; Kroppsresonanskontroll; Rundgångsreducering (frekvenssvep); Högpassfilter (HPF); Low cut-filter; Notch-filter; Fasomkopplare; Övrigt
pt-PT: Funcionalidades de controlo de feedback acústico do amplificador: Filtro anti-feedback (automático); Filtro anti-feedback (manual); Supressão automática de feedback; Controlo de ressonância do corpo; Redução de feedback (varrimento de frequência); Filtro passa-alto (HPF); Filtro low-cut; Filtro notch; Interruptor de fase; Outro
bg-BG: Функции за контрол на обратната връзка при акустичен усилвател: Филтър против микрофония (автоматичен); Филтър против микрофония (ръчен); Автоматично потискане на микрофонията; Контрол на резонанса на тялото; Намаляване на микрофонията (честотно сканиране); Високочестотен филтър (HPF); Нискочестотен филтър (Low-cut); Ноч филтър; Превключвател на фазата; Други
pl: Funkcje sterowania sprzężeniem zwrotnym wzmacniacza akustycznego: Filtr antysprzężeniowy (automatyczny); Filtr antysprzężeniowy (ręczny); Automatyczne tłumienie sprzężeń; Kontrola rezonansu pudła; Redukcja sprzężeń (przemiatanie częstotliwości); Filtr górnoprzepustowy (HPF); Filtr dolnozaporowy (low-cut); Filtr pasmowozaporowy (notch); Przełącznik fazy; Inne
sk-SK: Ovládacie prvky akustického zosilňovača spätná väzba: Filter proti spätnej väzbe (automatický); Filter proti spätnej väzbe (manuálny); Automatické potlačenie spätnej väzby; Ovládanie rezonancie tela; Redukcia spätnej väzby (frekvenčný zdvih); Filter s hornou priepustnosťou (HPF); Low-cut filter; Notch filter; Fázový prepínač; Iné
da: Funktioner til kontrol af feedback fra akustisk forstærker: Anti-feedback-filter (automatisk); Anti-feedback-filter (manuelt); Automatisk feedback-undertrykkelse; Kropsresonanskontrol; Feedback-reduktion (frekvens-sweep); High-pass-filter (HPF); Low-cut-filter; Notch-filter; Faseomskifter; Andet
fr: Fonctionnalités anti-larsen de l’amplificateur acoustique: Filtre anti-larsen (automatique); Filtre anti-larsen (manuel); Suppression automatique du larsen; Contrôle de la résonance du corps; Réduction du larsen (balayage de fréquences); Filtre passe-haut (FPH); Filtre coupe-bas; Filtre coupe-bande; Inverseur de phase; Autre
ja: 音響アンプのフィードバック制御機能: アンチフィードバックフィルター (自動); アンチフィードバックフィルター (手動); 自動フィードバック抑制; ボディレゾナンスコントロール; フィードバック低減 (周波数スイープ); ハイパスフィルター (HPF); ローカットフィルター; ノッチフィルター; フェーズスイッチ; その他
sl-SI: Funkcije za nadzor povratne zveze akustičnega ojačevalnika: Filter proti mikrofoniji (samodejni); Filter proti mikrofoniji (ročni); Samodejno odpravljanje mikrofonije; Nadzor resonance trupa; Zmanjšanje mikrofonije (frekvenčni pomik); Visokoprepustni filter (HPF); Nizkorezni filter; Zarezni filter (notch); Fazno stikalo; Drugo
ru: Функции управления обратной связью акустического усилителя: Фильтр подавления обратной связи (автоматический); Фильтр подавления обратной связи (ручной); Автоматическое подавление обратной связи; Управление резонансом корпуса; Снижение обратной связи (развертка частоты); Фильтр высоких частот (ФВЧ); Фильтр среза низких частот (Low-cut); Режекторный фильтр; Переключатель фазы; Другое
es: Características de control de retroalimentación del amplificador acústico: Filtro antirretroalimentación (automático); Filtro antirretroalimentación (manual); Supresión automática de retroalimentación; Control de resonancia del cuerpo; Reducción de retroalimentación (barrido de frecuencia); Filtro de paso alto (HPF); Filtro de corte bajo; Filtro notch; Interruptor de fase; Otro
nl: Functies voor feedbackregeling bij akoestische versterkers: Antifeedbackfilter (automatisch); Antifeedbackfilter (handmatig); Automatische feedbackonderdrukking; Kastresonantieregeling; Feedbackreductie (frequentiesweep); High-pass-filter (HPF); Low-cut-filter; Notch-filter; Faseschakelaar; Overig
de: Rückkopplungssteuerungsfunktionen des akustischen Verstärkers: Anti-Feedback-Filter (automatisch); Anti-Feedback-Filter (manuell); Automatische Feedback-Unterdrückung; Korpusresonanz-Steuerung; Feedback-Reduzierung (Frequency Sweep); Hochpassfilter (HPF); Low-Cut-Filter; Notch-Filter; Phasenschalter; Andere
cs: Funkce ovládání zpětné vazby akustického zesilovače: Filtr proti zpětné vazbě (automatický); Filtr proti zpětné vazbě (manuální); Automatické potlačení zpětné vazby; Ovládání rezonance těla; Redukce zpětné vazby (frekvenční sweep); Horní propust (HPF); Low-cut filtr; Notch filtr; Přepínač fáze; Ostatní
el: Λειτουργίες ελέγχου ανάδρασης ακουστικού ενισχυτή: Φίλτρο κατά του μικροφωνισμού (αυτόματο); Φίλτρο κατά του μικροφωνισμού (χειροκίνητο); Αυτόματη καταστολή μικροφωνισμού; Έλεγχος συντονισμού σώματος; Μείωση μικροφωνισμού (σάρωση συχνότητας); Υψιπερατό φίλτρο (HPF); Φίλτρο αποκοπής χαμηλών συχνοτήτων (low-cut); Ζωνοφρακτικό φίλτρο (notch); Διακόπτης φάσης; Άλλο
ko: 어쿠스틱 앰프 피드백 제어 기능: 안티 피드백 필터(자동); 안티 피드백 필터(수동); 자동 피드백 억제; 바디 공명 제어; 피드백 감소(주파수 스위프); 고역 통과 필터(HPF); 로우컷 필터; 노치 필터; 위상 스위치; 기타
zh-CN: 原声扩音器反馈控制功能: 防反馈滤波器（自动）; 防反馈滤波器（手动）; 自动防反馈; 琴身共振控制; 反馈抑制（频率扫描）; 高通滤波器 (HPF); 低切滤波器; 陷波滤波器; 相位开关; 其他
lt-LT: Akustinio stiprintuvo grįžtamojo ryšio valdymo funkcijos: Apsaugos nuo grįžtamojo ryšio filtras (automatinis); Apsaugos nuo grįžtamojo ryšio filtras (rankinis); Automatinis grįžtamojo ryšio slopinimas; Korpuso rezonanso valdymas; Grįžtamojo ryšio mažinimas (dažnių skenavimas); Aukštųjų dažnių filtras (HPF); Žemųjų dažnių slopinimo filtras; Išpjovos filtras; Fazių perjungiklis; Kita
zh-TW: 原音擴大機回授控制功能: 防回授濾波器 (自動); 防回授濾波器 (手動); 自動回授抑制; 琴身共鳴控制; 減少回授 (頻率掃描); 高通濾波器 (HPF); 低頻切除濾波器; 陷波濾波器; 相位開關; 其他
ro-RO: Funcții de control al feedbackului amplificatorului acustic: Filtru anti-feedback (automat); Filtru anti-feedback (manual); Suprimare automată a feedback-ului; Control al rezonanței corpului; Reducerea feedback-ului (baleiaj în frecvență); Filtru trece-sus (HPF); Filtru trece-sus (Low-cut); Filtru de rejecție tip notch; Comutator de fază; Altele
vi: Tính năng điều khiển phản hồi của bộ khuếch đại âm thanh: Bộ lọc chống hú (tự động); Bộ lọc chống hú (thủ công); Triệt tiêu tiếng hú tự động; Kiểm soát cộng hưởng thân đàn; Giảm tiếng hú (quét tần số); Bộ lọc thông cao (HPF); Bộ lọc cắt dải thấp; Bộ lọc Notch; Công tắc đảo pha; Khác
hr-HR: Značajke upravljanja povratnom vezom akustičnog pojačala: Filtar protiv mikrofonije (automatski); Filtar protiv mikrofonije (ručni); Automatsko suzbijanje mikrofonije; Kontrola rezonancije tijela; Smanjenje mikrofonije (frekvencijski sweep); Visokopropusni filtar (HPF); Low-cut filtar; Notch filtar; Prekidač faze; Ostalo
it: Funzioni di controllo del feedback dell'amplificatore acustico: Filtro anti-feedback (automatico); Filtro anti-feedback (manuale); Soppressione automatica del feedback; Controllo della risonanza del corpo; Riduzione del feedback (sweep di frequenza); Filtro passa-alto (HPF); Filtro taglia-basso; Filtro notch; Interruttore di fase; Altro
tr: Akustik amplifikatör geri bildirim kontrol özellikleri: Anti-feedback filtresi (otomatik); Anti-feedback filtresi (manuel); Otomatik geri besleme (feedback) bastırma; Gövde rezonans kontrolü; Geri besleme azaltma (frekans taraması); Yüksek geçiren filtre (HPF); Düşük frekans kesici filtre; Çentik filtresi; Faz anahtarı; Diğer
th: คุณสมบัติการควบคุมเสียงไมค์หอนของแอมป์อะคูสติก: ฟิลเตอร์ตัดเสียงหอน (อัตโนมัติ); ฟิลเตอร์ตัดเสียงหอน (ปรับเอง); ระบบระงับเสียงหอนอัตโนมัติ; ปุ่มควบคุมบอดี้เรโซแนนซ์; การลดเสียงหอน (กวาดความถี่); ไฮพาสฟิลเตอร์ (HPF); โลว์คัตฟิลเตอร์; น็อตช์ฟิลเตอร์; สวิตช์เฟส; อื่นๆ
en: Acoustic amplifier feedback control features: Anti-feedback filter (automatic); Anti-feedback filter (manual); Automatic feedback suppression; Body resonance control; Feedback reduction (frequency sweep); High-pass filter (HPF); Low-cut filter; Notch filter; Phase switch; Other
fi: Akustisen vahvistimen äänenkierron ohjausominaisuudet: Kierronestosuodatin (automaattinen); Kierronestosuodatin (manuaalinen); Automaattinen kierron vaimennus; Rungon resonanssin hallinta; Kierron vaimennus (taajuuspyyhkäisy); Ylipäästösuodatin (HPF); Alaleikkaussuodatin; Lovisuodatin; Vaihekytkin; Muu